Utah statutes.
62A-11-409.   Payor's compliance with income withholding.

(1)  Payment by a payor under this part satisfies the terms for payment of income under any contract between a payor and obligor.

(2)  A payor who complies with an income withholding notice that is regular on its face may not be subject to civil liability to any person for conduct in compliance with the notice.

